Texas, session 892, HB125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 573.001, Local Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 573.001.  COUNTY OR DISTRICT SUBJECT TO CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to: (1)  a county with a population of 2.8 million or more; (2)  a district or authority created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, that: (A)  has boundaries coterminous with a county described by Subdivision (1); and (B)  is authorized to provide stormwater drainage and flood control facilities; (3)  a county with a population of more than 1.3 million for which the primary source of drinking water is an underground aquifer; or (4)  a county [with a population of 800,000 or more] that: (A)  contains a portion of the Edwards Aquifer; or (B)  is located wholly or partly within the boundaries of the Hill Country Priority Groundwater Management Area. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.